Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Dockets

§ 9-5-201.
Dockets to be kept; general docket, and other entries therein.

The clerk shall keep a general docket in which he shall enter the names of the parties in each suit, the time of filing the complaint, petition or answer, and all other papers in the cause, the issuance and return of process, and a note of reference to all orders made therein by the book and page. He shall mark on the papers in every cause the style and number of the suit, and the time when and the party by whom filed. All the papers and pleadings filed in a cause shall be kept in the same file, and all the files kept in numerical order. The general docket shall be duly indexed, both direct and indirect, in the alphabetical order of the names of the parties, and each of them, so that the page of the docket containing the entries in each cause may be readily found.

The general docket required to be kept by this section and all other dockets or records required by law to be kept by the chancery clerk may be kept on computer in lieu of any other physical docket, record or well-bound book if all such dockets and records are kept by computer in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Administrative Office of Courts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 16; 1871, § 992; 1880, § 1809; 1892, § 463; 1906, § 512; Hemingway’s 1917, § 269; 1930, § 328; 1942, § 1238; Laws, 1964, ch. 308; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 8; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 13; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-5-203.
Matters testamentary, etc., to be docketed.

The clerk shall place on the general docket all applications made and proceedings had in said court in matters testamentary, of administration, in minors’ business, and in cases of persons of unsound mind, by entering the name of the person whose estate is the subject of the application or proceedings, the time of filing the application or other paper, the nature of it in brief terms, the issuance and return of process, if any, or publication and proof of it, and a note of reference to all orders made by the clerk or court, by the book and page, so that by reference to such docket the history of the administration of such estate may be traced.

Such docket may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-5-201.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1810; 1892, § 464; 1906, § 513; Hemingway’s 1917, § 270; 1930, § 329; 1942, § 1239; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 14; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-5-205.
Issue docket.

The chancery clerk shall keep an issue docket in which he shall set down (1) all causes triable according to due course at the instant term and (2) such other causes for final hearings as may be ordered (a) by the court or (b) by consent of all the parties. And he shall also place on said docket all petitions for the sale of the estates of decedents, minors and persons of unsound mind; all proceedings representing estates to be insolvent; final accounts of executors, administrators and guardians and petitions for distribution of an estate or payment of a legacy and all other similar matters in which an order or decree of the court is sought in matters testamentary, of administration, or guardianship, and wherein the issuance of process or notice is necessary to the final hearing on the matter so set down.

Such docket may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-5-201.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1240; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 53; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 15; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§§ 9-5-207 through 9-5-211.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-5-207. [Codes, 1942, § 1241; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 53]

§9-5-209. [Codes, 1942, § 1242; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 53]

§9-5-211. [Codes, 1942, § 1243; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 53]

§ 9-5-213.
Motion docket and entries.

The clerk shall also keep a motion docket in which he shall, in the order in which they are filed, docket as of course and without request, all demurrers, motions, ex parte petitions, exceptions to evidence or reports, and all matters pertaining to administration or guardianship not directed to be placed on the issue docket. He shall also place on the motion docket all matters brought before him in vacation when presented, and, at the next term of the court, all such matters on said docket shall be examined and disposed of by the court by approving or disapproving the same.

Such docket may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-5-201.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1244; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 53; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 16; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-5-215.
Loose leaf docket.

Any chancellor in this state may, by an order made and entered on the minute book of the chancery court in each of said counties in his district, require the docket of said court to be provided and kept as follows:

The clerk shall provide and keep, for the use of the chancellor, a loose leaf judge’s docket, in which he shall enter, on a separate sheet, each matter or cause now pending in the court, or hereafter instituted therein, together with a chronological list of all pleadings, orders and decrees in each such matter or cause.

The sheets on which the various matters or causes are entered shall be arranged in such docket as the chancellor may direct, and shall remain therein until each matter or cause is finally disposed of, when the sheet containing the entries concerning the same shall be removed, and placed in numerical order in a transfer binder.

All litigated or contested matters or causes appearing on the judge’s docket, which are triable by law, or by consent, at any term, shall be set for trial by the chancellor at such time during the term as he may direct. Provided, however, when any chancellor has entered an order on the minute book of the chancery court of the counties in his district requiring the docket of said court to be kept, as provided in this section, Sections 9-5-205 through 9-5-213 shall not apply to the chancery court of said district.

Such docket may be kept on computer as provided in Section 9-5-201.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1245; Laws, 1938, ch. 266; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 53; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 17; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 9-5-217.
Execution docket and entries therein.

The clerk shall keep an execution docket in the manner required of the clerk of the circuit court, in which he shall enter all final process issued by him, and record at large the returns that may be made thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1813; 1892, § 467; 1906, § 516; Hemingway’s 1917, § 273; 1930, § 336; 1942, § 1247.